New Jersey, session 222, A4573.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  A student shall be recorded with a State-excused absence on the students attendance record if the absence is the result of: (1)   the students religious observance pursuant to N.J.S.18A:36-14, N.J.S.18A:36-15, and N.J.S.18A:36-16; (2)   participation in observance of Veterans Day pursuant to section 1 of P.L.2015, c.297 (C.18A:36-13.2); (3)   participation in district board of election membership activities pursuant to section 1 of P.L.2001, c.271 (C.18A:36-33); (4)   participation in a civic event pursuant to section 2 of P.L.2023, c.274 (C.18A:36-33.2); (5)   participation in Take Our Children to Work Day; (6)   the closure of a busing school district that prevents a student from having transportation to the receiving school; and (7) a military service activity, a college, vocational, or trade school visit, or a labor-related open house, up to three days per school year, for a student in grades 11 and 12. b.    Any transcript, application, employment form, or any similar form on which information concerning a student's attendance record is requested shall not show excused absences authorized pursuant to this section.  In making a determination on whether a student has a perfect attendance record for the school year, a public school shall not consider as an absence a State-excused absence authorized pursuant to this section. c.     A student shall provide any documentation the superintendent or administrative principal of the school district deems necessary to prove the student meets the requirements for a State-excused absence. d.    As used in this section, military service activity means any activity required by the active and reserve components of the Armed Forces of the United States or the National Guard to be eligible to enlist in military service including, but not limited to, any testing, medical or physical evaluations, interviews, and fingerprinting. 2. This act shall take effect 180 days following the date of enactment, but shall remain inoperative until the first day of the first full school year following the effective date.